Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 3

Pain Management Clinics

63-1-301. Part definitions.

For purposes of this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Advanced practice registered nurse” means any person licensed under chapter 7 of this title, who meets the requirements of § 63-7-126;

“Chronic nonmalignant pain treatment” means prescribing or dispensing opioids, benzodiazepines, barbiturates or carisoprodol for ninety (90) days or more in a twelve-month period for pain unrelated to cancer or palliative care;

“Department” means the department of health;

“Medical director” means an individual who:

Is licensed as a physician under chapter 6 or 9 of this title, and who practices in this state with an unrestricted, unencumbered license;

Provides oversight relative to the operations of a pain management clinic; and

Is a pain management specialist on or after July 1, 2016;

“Medical doctor” means any person licensed under chapter 6 of this title;

“Osteopathic physician” means any person licensed under chapter 9 of this title;

“‘Pain management clinic’ or ‘clinic’” means a privately-owned clinic, facility or office in which any health care provider licensed under this title provides chronic nonmalignant pain treatment to a majority of its patients for ninety (90) days or more in a twelve-month period. For purposes of determining if a clinic, facility, or office qualifies as a pain management clinic under this subdivision (8)(A), the entire clinic, facility, or office caseload of patients who received medical care services from all medical doctors, osteopathic physicians, advanced practice registered nurses and physician assistants who serve in the clinic, facility or office shall be counted;

“Pain management clinic” also means a privately-owned clinic, facility or office which advertises in any medium for pain management services of any type.

A pain management clinic does not include any clinic, facility, or office which provides interventional pain management as defined in § 63-6-244 and whose clinic, facility or office does not provide chronic nonmalignant pain treatment to a majority of the patients of a clinic, facility or office for ninety (90) days or more in a twelve-month period;

“Pain management clinic” does not mean a clinic, facility, or office that is wholly owned and operated by a physician multispecialty practice in which one (1) or more board-eligible or board-certified medical specialists who have also completed fellowships in pain medicine or pain management approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education, or who are also board-certified in pain medicine or pain management by the American Board of Pain Medicine or a board approved by the American Board of Medical Specialties, the American Association of Physician Specialists, or the American Osteopathic Association to perform the pain management services for chronic pain patients;

“Pain management specialist” means a physician licensed under chapter 6 or 9 of this title who:

Has a subspecialty certification in pain medicine or pain management as accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME) through either the American Board of Medical Specialties (ABMS) or the American Osteopathic Association (AOA), or is eligible to sit for the board examination offered by ABMS or AOA;

Holds an unencumbered Tennessee license; and

Maintains the minimum number of continuing medical education (CME) hours in pain medicine or pain management to satisfy retention of ABMS or AOA certification. Any exceptions to this requirement shall be approved by the respective regulatory board;

Attains American Board of Pain Medicine (ABPM) diplomate status;

Holds an unencumbered Tennessee license; and

Maintains the minimum number of CME hours in pain management to satisfy retention of ABPM diplomate status. Any exceptions to this requirement shall be approved by the respective regulatory board;

Is board certified by the American Board of Interventional Pain Physicians (ABIPP) by passing exam 1 on or before June 30, 2016, and holds an unencumbered Tennessee license and maintains the minimum number of CME hours in pain management to satisfy retention of ABIPP diplomate status; provided, that on and after July 1, 2016, a new applicant shall only qualify as a pain management specialist under this subdivision (9)(C) if the applicant is board certified by ABIPP by passing parts 1 and 2 of its examination, and holds an unencumbered Tennessee license and maintains the minimum number of CME hours in pain management to satisfy retention of ABIPP diplomate status; or

Has an active pain management practice in a clinic accredited in outpatient interdisciplinary pain rehabilitation by the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities or any successor organization and holds an unencumbered Tennessee license.

“Physician assistant” means any person licensed under chapter 19 of this title.

Acts 2011, ch. 340, § 1; 2012, ch. 869, § 1; 2013, ch. 336, § 2; 2013, ch. 430, § 7; 2014, ch. 700, § 1; 2015, ch. 475, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 829, § 1; 2016, ch. 980, §§ 5-7; 2016, ch. 1033, §§ 6, 7; 2017, ch. 210, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 336, § 2, effective from July 1, 2013, until October 1, 2013, amended the definition of “pain management clinic” to read: “(5) ‘Pain management clinic’ means a privately-owned facility in which a majority of the facility's patients, seen by any or all of its medical doctors, osteopathic physicians, advanced practice nurses with certificates of fitness to prescribe, or physician assistants, are provided pain management services by being prescribed opioids, benzodiazepines, barbiturates, or carisoprodol, but not suboxone, for more than ninety (90) days in a twelve-month period; and”.

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 1 provided that the act, which amended the definition of “pain management clinic”, shall be known and may be cited as the “Addison Sharp Prescription Regulatory Act of 2013.”

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 11 provided that the department of health, the board of pharmacy or any board operating under title 63, is authorized to use emergency rules under § 4-5-208(a)(5), in order to promulgate any rules required by the act.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment by ch. 1033, effective July 1, 2017, deleted the former definition of “certificate holder”, which read: “‘Certificate holder’ means a medical doctor licensed under chapter 6 of this title; an osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 9 of this title; an advanced practice nurse licensed under chapter 7 of this title, who meets the requirements contained in § 63-7-126; or a physician assistant licensed under chapter 19 of this title, who practices in this state with an unrestricted, unencumbered license. Anyone with an ownership interest in a pain management clinic shall be eligible to be the certificate holder;”; and substituted the defined term “‘pain management clinic’ or ‘clinic’” for “pain management clinic”.

The 2017 amendment, in (D) of the definition of “pain management clinic”, substituted “one (1) or more” for “one or more” near the beginning, inserted “or pain management” twice, and substituted “to perform the” for “perform the” near the end; and, in the definition of “pain management specialist”, inserted “or pain management” in (A)(i), and inserted “pain medicine or” in (A)(iii).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 18. July 1, 2017; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 28, 2016.Acts 2017, ch. 210, § 4. July 1, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).

63-1-302. Exemptions from part.

This part does not apply to:

A medical or dental school, an osteopathic medical school, a nursing school, a physician assistant program or an outpatient clinic associated with any of the foregoing schools or programs, including, but not limited to, clinics that have an agreement to train residents by members of that clinic who are appointed as adjunct faculty of the school or program;

A hospital as defined in § 68-11-201, including any outpatient facility or clinic of a hospital if such outpatient facility or clinic is regulated under title 68;

Hospice services as defined in § 68-11-201;

A nursing home as defined in § 68-11-201;

A facility maintained or operated by this state; or

A hospital or clinic maintained or operated by the federal government.

Acts 2011, ch. 340, § 1; 2012, ch. 869, §§ 2, 3.

63-1-303. Regulation of licensed healthcare practitioners — Rules and regulations.

Each licensed healthcare practitioner who provides services at a pain management clinic shall continue to be regulated only by the board which has issued a license to that practitioner.

A licensed health care practitioner shall notify the board that has licensed the practitioner within ten (10) days of starting or ending work at any pain management clinic.

On or before October 1, 2011, the commissioner of health, in consultation with the board of medical examiners, the board of osteopathic examination, the board of nursing, and the committee on physician assistants, shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this part, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The rules adopted pursuant to subsection (b) shall address the following topics, among others:

The operation of the clinic, including requirements:

That patients have current and valid government issued identification or current health insurance card issued by either a government or private carrier; and

That providers conduct urine drug screening in accordance with a written drug screening compliance plan as required by rules promulgated by the commissioner of health pursuant to subsection (b);

Personnel requirements for the clinic;

Training requirements for clinic providers who are regulated by that board;

Patient records;

Standards to ensure quality of patient care;

Infection control;

Health and safety requirements;

License application and renewal procedures and requirements;

Data collection and reporting requirements;

Inspections and complaint investigations; and

Patient billing procedures.

Acts 2011, ch. 340, § 1; 2013, ch. 430, § 8; 2014, ch. 700, § 2; 2014, ch. 983, § 1; 2016, ch. 1033, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (c), shall be known and may be cited as the “Addison Sharp Prescription Regulatory Act of 2013.”

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 11 provided that the department of health, the board of pharmacy or any board operating under title 63, is authorized to use emergency rules under § 4-5-208(a)(5), in order to promulgate any rules required by the act.

Acts 2014, ch. 983, § 5 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment by ch. 1033, effective July 1, 2017, deleted the former definition of “certificate holder”, which read: “‘Certificate holder’ means a medical doctor licensed under chapter 6 of this title; an osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 9 of this title; an advanced practice nurse licensed under chapter 7 of this title, who meets the requirements contained in § 63-7-126; or a physician assistant licensed under chapter 19 of this title, who practices in this state with an unrestricted, unencumbered license. Anyone with an ownership interest in a pain management clinic shall be eligible to be the certificate holder;”; and substituted the defined term “‘pain management clinic’ or ‘clinic’” for “pain management clinic”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 18. July 1, 2017; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 28, 2016.

Law Reviews.

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).

63-1-304. Inspections.

Each board shall have the authority to inspect a pain management clinic which utilizes the services of a practitioner licensed by that board. During such inspections, the authorized representatives of the board may inspect all necessary documents and medical records to ensure compliance with this part and all other applicable laws and rules.

Acts 2011, ch. 340, § 1.

63-1-305. Investigation of complaints.

Each board shall have the authority to investigate a complaint alleging a violation of this part, or a rule adopted under this part, by a pain management clinic utilizing the services of a healthcare practitioner licensed by that board. Each board shall also have the authority to investigate a complaint alleging that a pain management clinic utilizing the services of a healthcare practitioner licensed by that board is not properly licensed by the department as required by this part.

Acts 2011, ch. 340, § 1; 2016, ch. 1033, § 9.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “pain management clinic utilizing the services of a healthcare practitioner licensed by that board is not properly licensed” for “facility utilizing the services of a healthcare practitioner licensed by that board is not properly certified” in the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 18. July 1, 2017; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 28, 2016.

63-1-306. Medical director — Operation certificate — Disciplinary action.

Each pain management clinic must have a medical director who is a medical doctor or osteopathic physician who practices in this state under an unrestricted and unencumbered license issued pursuant to § 63-6-201 or § 63-9-104.

In addition to the requirements of subdivision (a)(1), each physician serving as a medical director at a pain management clinic shall be a pain management specialist.

All advanced practice registered nurses licensed under chapter 7 of this title, who practice in a licensed pain clinic, shall collaborate with a pain medicine specialist.

All physician assistants licensed under chapter 19 of this title who practice in a licensed pain clinic shall collaborate with a pain medicine specialist.

In the event that the medical director, for whatever reason, no longer meets the requirements of this part, the pain management clinic must notify the department, in writing within ten (10) business days, of the identity of another physician who meets the requirements of this part and will act as medical director and provide all necessary documentation required by the department to establish that the replacement is qualified as required by this part. Any clinic that fails to provide such timely written notice must cease operations until the notice is provided and the department has confirmed in writing that the replacement medical director is duly qualified. Continuation of operations without the timely written notice required by this subsection (b) constitutes grounds for disciplinary action against the clinic under this part.

Any board that assesses any discipline or penalty against a provider that it licenses for a violation of rules promulgated under this part shall inform the department of any penalty or discipline imposed on such a provider for a violation of rules promulgated under this part within thirty (30) days of imposing the discipline or penalty, and the department may consider such discipline or penalty as a basis for disciplinary action against the pain management clinic pursuant to this subsection (c).

The pain management clinic shall post the license in a conspicuous location so as to be clearly visible to patients.

The department shall have the authority to adopt rules, including emergency rules if deemed necessary, to implement this part for which the department has responsibility.

Acts 2011, ch. 340, § 1; 2012, ch. 869, § 4; 2015, ch. 475, §§ 4, 5; 2016, ch. 1033, § 10; 2017, ch. 334, § 1; 2018, ch. 610, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act relative to the relationship between physicians and advanced practice registered nurses, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 334.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “(a)(1) A pain management clinic, as defined in this part, must have a medical director who is a physician that practices in this state under an unrestricted and unencumbered license issued pursuant to § 63-6-201 or § 63-9-104. “(2) In addition to the requirements of subdivision (a)(1), each physician serving as a medical director at a pain management clinic shall be a pain management specialist as defined in this part. “(3) All advanced practice nurses licensed under chapter 7 of this title and physician assistants licensed under chapter 19 of this title, who practice in a certified pain clinic, shall be supervised by a pain medicine specialist as defined in this part.“(b) In the event that the medical director, for whatever reason, no longer meets the requirements of this part, the pain management clinic must notify the department, within ten (10) business days, of the identity of another physician who meets the requirements of this part and will act as medical director. A change of majority ownership of a certified pain management clinic requires the submission of a new application for a certificate. Failure to notify the department within ten (10) business days may be the basis for a summary suspension of the clinic's certification.“(c) (1) Every pain management clinic shall submit an application to the department on a form prescribed by the department for a certificate to operate the clinic. A certificate may be awarded to a certificate holder. The certificate holder shall be one (1) of the owners of the clinic. “(2) A completed form for a certificate prescribed by the department shall show proof that the clinic has a medical director who is a pain management specialist as defined in this part.“(d) Each clinic location shall be certified separately regardless of whether the clinic is operated under the same business name, ownership or management as another clinic.“(e) The department shall issue a certificate if the department finds that the pain management clinic meets the requirements of this part and that the fee required by the department has been paid.“(f) (1) If the department finds that a pain management clinic which was issued a certificate no longer meets any requirement of this part, including, but not limited to, any violation of any rule promulgated by the department pursuant to this part, the department may impose lawful disciplinary action against the pain management clinic, including, but not limited to, the revocation or suspension of its certificate, and the imposition of a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day of continued violation. The pain management clinic shall be entitled to a hearing pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Further, the department has the discretion to lift the suspension of a certificate when the clinic demonstrates compliance to the department. “(2) Any board which assesses any discipline or penalty against a provider that it licenses for a violation of rules promulgated under this part shall inform the department of any penalty or discipline imposed on such a provider for a violation of rules promulgated under this part within thirty (30) days of imposing the discipline or penalty, and the department may consider such discipline or penalty as a basis for disciplinary action against the pain management clinic pursuant to this subsection (f).“(g) The clinic shall post the certificate in a conspicuous location so as to be clearly visible to patients.“(h) The department is authorized to charge a fee for the issuance of a certificate.“(i) The department and each board identified in § 63-1-303(b) shall post on its web site an announcement of the requirement that a pain management clinic obtain a certificate from the department, and each board identified in § 63-1-303(b) shall include information about such requirement in a routine communication sent by each board to its licensees.“(j) A pain management clinic operating on or before January 1, 2012, may continue to operate as long as an application for certification is timely filed on or before October 1, 2012. This provision shall apply retroactively to applications for certification filed since January 1, 2012.“(k) The department shall have the authority to adopt rules, including emergency rules if deemed necessary, to implement this part for which the department has responsibility.”The 2017 amendment divided former (a)(3) into present (a)(3)(A) and (B), in present (a)(3)(A), by substituting “under chapter 7 of this title, who practice in a licensed pain clinic, shall collaborate with a pain medicine specialist. (B) All physician assistants” for “under chapter 7 of this title and physician assistants”; and in present (a)(3)(B), substituted “licensed pain clinic” for “licensed pain management clinic” and substituted “pain medicine specialist” for “pain management specialist.”

The 2018 amendment substituted “shall collaborate with a pain medicine specialist” for “shall be supervised by a pain medicine specialist” at the end of (a)(3)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 18. July 1, 2017; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 28, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 334, § 15. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 610, § 42. July 1, 2018.

Law Reviews.

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).

63-1-307. [Repealed.]

Acts 2011, ch. 340, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 11, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-307, concerned the expiration of a pain management clinic certificate.

63-1-308. [Repealed.]

Acts 2011, ch. 340, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 12, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-308, concerned the renewal of a pain management clinic certificate.

63-1-309. Restrictions on ownership — Documentation of controlled substances dispensed or prescribed — Required medical director hours.

A pain management clinic may not be owned wholly or partly by a person who has been convicted of, pled nolo contendere to, or received deferred adjudication for:

An offense that constitutes a felony; or

An offense that constitutes a misdemeanor, the facts of which relate to the distribution of illegal prescription drugs or a controlled substance or controlled substance analogue as defined in § 39-17-402.

If any practitioner providing services at a pain management clinic prescribes controlled substances for the treatment of chronic nonmalignant pain, the practitioner must document in the patient's record the reason for prescribing that quantity.

A medical director shall be onsite at least twenty percent (20%) of the clinic’s weekly total number of operating hours. A medical director shall serve as medical director and provide services for no more than four (4) pain management clinics.

Acts 2011, ch. 340, § 1; 2012, ch. 848, § 65; 2012, ch. 869, § 5; 2012, ch. 880, § 24; 2013, ch. 336, §§ 3, 4; 2013, ch. 430, § 9; 2016, ch. 1002, § 13; 2016, ch. 1033, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (c), shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2012.”

Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 25, provided that this section shall be interpreted to be consistent with all state and federal laws addressing privacy of patient records.

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (d), shall be known and may be cited as the “Addison Sharp Prescription Regulatory Act of 2013.”

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 11 provided that the department of health, the board of pharmacy or any board operating under title 63, is authorized to use emergency rules under § 4-5-208(a)(5), in order to promulgate any rules required by the act.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 13, deleted the provisions of Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 29 that provided for the expiration of the amendments by Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 24. Therefore, those amendments remain in effect.

63-1-310. Payments.

A pain management clinic may accept only a check or credit card in payment for services provided at the clinic, except as provided in subsection (b).

A payment may be made in cash for a co-pay, coinsurance or deductible when the remainder of the charge for the services will be submitted to the patient's insurance plan for reimbursement.

Acts 2011, ch. 340, § 1; 2013, ch. 430, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (a), shall be known and may be cited as the “Addison Sharp Prescription Regulatory Act of 2013.”

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 11 provided that the department of health, the board of pharmacy or any board operating under title 63, is authorized to use emergency rules under § 4-5-208(a)(5), in order to promulgate any rules required by the act.

63-1-311. Violations — Penalties.

A violation of this part, or a rule adopted under this part, is grounds for disciplinary action against a practitioner providing services at a pain management clinic licensed under this part by the board that licensed that practitioner.

A practitioner who provides pain management services at an unlicensed pain management clinic is subject to disciplinary action against the practitioner's license, up to and including revocation, as well as an administrative penalty of no less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day of unlicensed operation and not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day of unlicensed operation, imposed by the board that licensed that practitioner, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Before such a penalty may be assessed by the board, the board shall give at least thirty (30) days' notice to the practitioner of the alleged violation of this part.

Any owner of an unlicensed pain management clinic is subject to disciplinary action against the practitioner's license, up to and including revocation, as well as an administrative penalty of no less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day of unlicensed operation and not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day of unlicensed operation, imposed by the department of health, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. Any owner may also be charged the costs of any inspection or investigation pursuant to this part, as well as the costs of prosecution and other costs permitted under § 63-1-144 and that formed the basis of disciplinary action provided for in this part. Before such a penalty may be assessed by the department, the department shall give at least thirty (30) days' notice to the owners of the alleged violation of this part.

Acts 2011, ch. 340, § 1; 2013, ch. 430, §§ 12, 13; 2016, ch. 1033, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (b) and added subsection (c), shall be known and may be cited as the “Addison Sharp Prescription Regulatory Act of 2013.”

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 11 provided that the department of health, the board of pharmacy or any board operating under title 63, is authorized to use emergency rules under § 4-5-208(a)(5), in order to promulgate any rules required by the act.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the section, which read: “(a) A violation of this part, or a rule adopted under this part, is grounds for disciplinary action against a practitioner providing services at a pain management clinic certified under this part by the board which licensed that practitioner.”“(b) A practitioner who provides pain management services at an uncertified pain management clinic is subject to an administrative penalty of no less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day and which shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day, imposed by the board which licensed that practitioner, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Before such a penalty may be assessed by the board, the board shall give at least thirty (30) days' notice to the practitioner of the alleged violation of this part.“(c) An owner, co-owner, or operator of an uncertified pain management clinic is subject to an administrative penalty of no less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day and which shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day, imposed by the department of health, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. Before such a penalty may be assessed by the department, the department shall give at least thirty (30) days' notice to the owner, co-owner, or operator of the alleged violation of this part.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 18. July 1, 2017; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 28, 2016.

Law Reviews.

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).

63-1-312. [Repealed.]

Acts 2012, ch. 869, § 6; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 15, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-312, concerned the involuntary inactivation of a pain management clinic certificate.

63-1-313. Dispensing of controlled substances by pain management clinics or medical personnel working at pain management clinics.

Notwithstanding any provision of this title or title 53, chapters 10 and 11 to the contrary, no pain management clinic or medical doctor, osteopathic physician, advanced practice registered nurse with certificates of fitness to prescribe, or physician assistant working at a pain management clinic shall be permitted to dispense controlled substances; provided, however, that this subsection (a) shall not prohibit a medical doctor, osteopathic physician, advanced practice registered nurse with certificates of fitness to prescribe, or physician assistant working at a pain management clinic from providing to that practitioner's patient, without charge, a sample of a schedule IV or schedule V controlled substance in a quantity limited to an amount that is adequate to treat the patient for a maximum of seventy-two (72) hours or a sample of a non-narcotic schedule V controlled substance in a quantity limited to an amount that is adequate to treat the patient for a maximum of fourteen (14) days.

For the purposes of this section, “controlled substance” has the meaning given in § 39-17-402.

Acts 2013, ch. 336, § 1; 2014, ch. 842, § 1; 2016, ch. 980, § 8.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 14 purported to enact § 63-1-313. Section 63-1-313 was previously enacted by Acts 2013, ch. 336, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 14 was designated as § 63-1-314 by the authority of the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 842 took effect on April 28, 2014.

Cross-References. Criteria for schedule IV drugs, § 39-17-411.

Criteria for schedule V drugs, § 39-17-413.

63-1-314. Reporting on prescription drug abuse and pain management clinics

The commissioner of health and each appropriate occupational professional licensing board governing licensees who may legally prescribe or dispense controlled substances shall prepare a comprehensive report on actions relative to prescription drug abuse and pain management clinics to the general assembly no later than January 31 for actions in the prior calendar year. This report shall summarize the number of complaints received, frequent findings, and actions taken.

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 14.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 14 purported to enact § 63-1-313. Section 63-1-313 was previously enacted by Acts 2013, ch. 336, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 14 was designated as § 63-1-314 by the authority of the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Addison Sharp Prescription Regulatory Act of 2013.”

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 11 provided that the department of health, the board of pharmacy or any board operating under title 63, is authorized to use emergency rules under § 4-5-208(a)(5), in order to promulgate any rules required by the act.

63-1-315. Inspection of office suspected of operating as unlicensed pain management clinic — Prohibited admission of new patients.

Notwithstanding this title or title 68, for the purposes of determining if a health care provider's office is operating as a pain management clinic, the department of health is authorized to conduct an unannounced inspection process, which may include, but not be limited to, review of business and medical records, when the department has reasonable suspicion that the office is operating as an unlicensed pain management clinic. As part of this inspection process, the health care provider's office shall be required to produce evidence that the majority of its patient population is not receiving chronic nonmalignant pain treatment.

If the health care provider's office is unable during the inspection process to provide satisfactory evidence that the office does not meet the definition of a pain management clinic, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the provider's office was operating as a pain management clinic in any administrative proceeding arising from such inspection process.

The requirements for evidence under this section shall be established by rule.

Any health care provider's office rebuttably presumed to be operating an unlicensed pain management clinic shall be prohibited from admitting any new patients to the practice immediately upon receipt of written notice to any provider at the clinic and all owners and providers at such clinic shall be subject to a hearing upon thirty (30) days' notice before the licensee's licensing board to consider whether the individual's license to practice should be revoked or otherwise disciplined. Pursuant to this part, the commissioner may promulgate rules providing for an informal advisory administrative hearing by a panel appointed by the commissioner to review the department's determination regarding the unlicensed operation of the clinic and to provide nonbinding recommendations to the commissioner concerning those determinations. The informal administrative hearing shall not be subject to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Individuals appointed to any panel pursuant to this part shall be considered “state employees” for purposes of title 8, chapter 42, and § 9-8-307.

Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 18. July 1, 2017; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 28, 2016.